Florida, session 2026, HB1161.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (9) of section 373.0693, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
373.0693 Basins; basin boards.—
(9) At 11:59 p.m. on December 31, 1976, a portion of the
Big Cypress Basin of the Ridge and Lower Gulf Coast District
which is being annexed into the South Florida Water Management
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1161-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1161 2026
District by change of boundaries pursuant to chapter 76-243,
Laws of Florida, shall be formed into a subdistrict or basin of
the South Florida Water Management District. Such portion shall
be designated as the Big Cypress Basin. On or before December
31, 1976, The Governor shall appoint six not fewer than five
persons from Collier County and two persons from Lee County who
reside within the Big Cypress Basin residing in the area to
serve as members of the governing board of the basin, effective
at the time of transfer and subject to confirmation by the
Senate as provided in subsection (4).
(a) The initial boundaries of the Big Cypress Basin shall
be established by resolution of the governing board of Central
and Southern Florida Flood Control District, after notice and
hearing, and generally shall encompass the Big Cypress Swamp and
southwestern coastal area hydrologic cataloging unit, as
indicated on River Basin and Hydrologic Unit Map of Florida—
1975, Florida Department of Natural Resources, Bureau of Geology
Map Series No. 72.
(b) At 11:59 p.m. on July 1, 2026, the governing board of
the South Florida Water Management District shall establish the
boundary of the Big Cypress Basin as the scientific boundary
recommended in the Big Cypress Basin Boundary Delineation study
that the district presented to the Legislature on January 12,
2021, except that the new basin boundary may include only
counties that have at least 25 percent of their jurisdictions
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1161-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1161 2026
delineated within the boundary.
(b) If the governing board shall fail to establish the
initial boundaries on or before December 31, 1976, the initial
boundaries shall be the same boundaries as described for the Big
Cypress Basin of the Ridge and Lower Gulf Coast District.
(c) The governing board of the South Florida Water
Management District subsequently may change the boundaries of
the basin, but may not abolish the basin.
Section 2. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section
373.503, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
373.503 Manner of taxation.—
(3) The districts may levy ad valorem taxes on property
within the district solely for the purposes of this chapter and
of chapter 25270, 1949, Laws of Florida, as amended, and chapter
61-691, Laws of Florida, as amended. If appropriate, taxes
levied by each governing board may be separated by the governing
board into a millage necessary for the purposes of the district
and a millage necessary for financing basin functions specified
in s. 373.0695.
(b) The apportionment in The South Florida Water
Management District shall ensure that:
1. The apportionment within the district is be a maximum
of 40 percent for district purposes and a maximum of 60 percent
for basin purposes; and
2. The basin ad valorem taxes levied within the counties
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1161-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1161 2026
that comprise the Big Cypress Basin are used for projects and
flood control operations and maintenance within the counties in
which such taxes were collected, respectively.
Section 3. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
made by this act to section 373.503, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, section 373.0697, Florida Statutes, is
reenacted to read:
373.0697 Basin taxes.—The respective basins may, pursuant
to s. 9(b), Art. VII of the State Constitution, by resolution
request the governing board of the district to levy ad valorem
taxes within such basin. Upon receipt of such request, a basin
tax levy shall be made by the governing board of the district to
finance basin functions enumerated in s. 373.0695,
notwithstanding the provisions of any other general or special
law to the contrary, and subject to the provisions of s.
373.503(3).
(1) The amount of money to be raised by said tax levy
shall be determined by the adoption of an annual budget by the
district board of governors, and the average millage for the
basin shall be that amount required to raise the amount called
for by the annual budget when applied to the total assessment of
the basin as determined for county taxing purposes. However, no
such tax shall be levied within the basin unless and until the
annual budget and required tax levy shall have been approved by
100 formal action of the basin board, and no county in the district
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1161-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1161 2026
101 shall be taxed under this provision at a rate to exceed 1 mill.
102 (2) The taxes provided for in this section shall be
103 extended by the county property appraiser on the county tax roll
104 in each county within, or partly within, the basin and shall be
105 collected by the tax collector in the same manner and time as
106 county taxes, and the proceeds therefrom paid to the district
107 for basin purposes. Said taxes shall be a lien, until paid, on
108 the property against which assessed and enforceable in like
109 manner as county taxes. The property appraisers, tax collectors,
110 and clerks of the circuit court of the respective counties shall
111 be entitled to compensation for services performed in connection
112 with such taxes at the same rates as apply to county taxes.
113 (3) It is hereby determined that the taxes authorized by
114 this subsection are in proportion to the benefits to be derived
115 by the several parcels of real estate within the basin from the
116 works authorized herein.
117 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1161-00